Utah statutes.
17B-1-610.   Public hearing on tentatively adopted budget.
At the time and place advertised, or at any time or any place to which the
public hearing may be adjourned, the board of trustees shall:
(1)  hold a public hearing on the budgets tentatively adopted; and
(2)  give all interested persons in attendance an opportunity to be heard on
the estimates of revenues and expenditures or any item in the tentative budget
of any fund.
